Nevada, session 83, AB587.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. The State Controller shall transfer from the
Account to Stabilize the Operation of the State Government created
by NRS 353.288 to the State General Fund the sum of $288,742,305
in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and $61,813,016 in Fiscal Year 2026-
2027 for unrestricted State General Fund use.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB587*